Massachusetts, session 194th, H4565.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Department of
Transitional Assistance shall establish a sick leave bank for Marie Letendre, an employee of the
Department. Any employee of the Department may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick,
personal or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Marie Letendre. If Marie Letendre
terminates employment with the Department or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any
remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick
leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that
necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the Department.
of 1